Hawaii statutes.
§604-11.5 Same; offenses committed within
the circuit. The several district courts shall have jurisdiction, except
as otherwise provided, of all criminal offenses cognizable under the laws of
the State, committed within their respective circuits or transferred to them
for trial by change of venue from some other district court. [L 1971, c 144,
§6C]

Rules of Court

Penal proceedings, venue, see HRPP rules 18, 21, and 22.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next